Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 5
INCARCERATION

16-5-501. Prosecuting attorney - incarceration - legal representation and supporting services at state expense. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part added, p. 928, § 1, September 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 732, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1496, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1491, § 134, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1929, § 41, effective October 1; entire section repealed, (HB 13-1210), ch. 306, p. 1624, § 3, effective January 1, 2014.